Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1220
Comparable replacement dwelling, defined.

Comparable replacement dwelling shall mean any dwelling that is (1) decent, safe, and sanitary, (2) adequate in size to accommodate the occupants, (3) within the financial means of the displaced person, (4) functionally equivalent to the dwelling that the displaced person is required to leave, (5) in an area not subject to unreasonable adverse environmental conditions, and (6) in a location not less desirable than the location of the displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services, and the displaced person's place of employment.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 7.